Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Development of Minnesota Vision of a Learner. new text end new text begin (a) The legislature recognizes the goal of preparing students to: new text end new text begin (1) be successful after high school graduation; new text end new text begin (2) lead rich and rewarding lives; new text end new text begin (3) participate meaningfully in their families and communities; new text end new text begin (4) help sustain a fair and just civil society and democracy; and new text end new text begin (5) contribute to a thriving workforce and economy. new text end new text begin The legislature further recognizes that meeting this goal requires students to build deep, applied, transferable knowledge and skills. new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota P-20 Education Partnership must convene and chair a working group to develop a Minnesota Vision of a Learner that describes the knowledge and skills students need to develop to achieve the goals listed in paragraph (a). The working group must gather input in a variety of ways, including conducting listening sessions and public surveys, and reviewing existing locally adopted visions of a learner. Members of the working group must be compensated in accordance with section 15.059, subdivision 3. The working group must reflect the diversity of students across Minnesota, and must include one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) high school students currently enrolled in school districts or charter schools; new text end new text begin (2) former students who graduated from a Minnesota public high school within the preceding five years; new text end new text begin (3) parents of students currently enrolled in school districts or charter schools; new text end new text begin (4) licensed teachers currently working in Minnesota public schools; new text end new text begin (5) licensed teachers or administrators currently working with students that receive special education instruction and services in: new text end new text begin (i) an intermediate school district or other cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (ii) a level four special education program; or new text end new text begin (iii) a transition program serving students ages 18 to 22; new text end new text begin (6) school board members; new text end new text begin (7) school district administrators, including superintendents; new text end new text begin (8) faculty at Minnesota postsecondary institutions; new text end new text begin (9) civic and community leaders; new text end new text begin (10) representatives from the business community; new text end new text begin (11) representatives from the Tribal Nations Education Committee; and new text end new text begin (12) experts in educational measurement. new text end new text begin (c) The working group must post a description of the Minnesota Vision of a Learner no later than January 15, 2028, on the websites of the Department of Education; Department of Children, Youth, and Families; Department of Employment and Economic Development; Department of Labor and Industry; Office of Higher Education; and the P-20 Education Partnership. new text end new text begin (d) School districts and charter schools may adopt the Minnesota Vision of a Learner as a local vision of a learner, adapt the state vision, develop a different local vision, or adopt no vision of a learner. Nothing in this subdivision supersedes existing or future locally developed visions of a learner or requires that a district or school adopt a vision of a learner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Standards development. (a) The commissioner must consider advice from at least the following stakeholders in developing statewide rigorous core academic standards in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, including history, geography, economics, government and citizenship, health, and the arts: (1) parents of school-age children and members of the public throughout the state; (2) teachers throughout the state currently licensed and providing instruction in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, health, or the arts and licensed elementary and secondary school principals throughout the state currently administering a school site; (3) currently serving members of local school boards and charter school boards throughout the state; (4) faculty teaching core subjects at postsecondary institutions in Minnesota; (5) representatives of the Minnesota business community; (6) representatives from the Tribal Nations Education Committee and Tribal Nations and communities in Minnesota, including both Anishinaabe and Dakota; and (7) current students, with input from the Minnesota Youth Council. (b) Academic standards must: (1) be clear, concise, objective, measurable, and grade-level appropriate; (2) not require a specific teaching methodology or curriculum; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) be consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the state of Minnesotadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) for academic standards reviewed after July 1, 2026, be organized and presented as coherent progressions of learning within each discipline and across grade levels; and new text end new text begin (5) for academic standards reviewed after July 1, 2026, align with and reference appropriate aspects of the Minnesota Vision of a Learner under section 120B.02, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA VISION OF A LEARNER WORKING GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minnesota Vision of a Learner. new text end new text begin For the P-20 Education Partnership for the Minnesota Vision of a Learner working group under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.02, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end